Arkansas, session 2025, SB540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) A 2025 position statement from the American Academy of
Neurology endorsed a three-month seizure-free period for drivers with
seizures;
(2) Seizures are a common occurrence, affecting between nine
percent (9%) and ten percent (10%) of the population over the course of a
person's lifetime; and
(3) Driving is highly regulated for people with epilepsy,
compromising their independence, ability to work, and ability to maintain
relationships, despite the fact that epilepsy-related car crashes constitute
only two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) of car crashes in the United States
*ZRC102*
03-31-2025 09:47:32 ZRC102

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB540
compared to the four percent (4%) of car crashes related to cardiovascular
disease and thirty percent (30%) of car crashes related to alcohol.
(b) The General Assembly intends for this act to align Arkansas
driving laws with the American Academy of Neurology's recommendations and the
majority of other states regarding the operation of a motor vehicle by a
person who has previously suffered a seizure.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-16-909(b), concerning the suspension or
revocation of a driver's license for the inability to drive, is amended to
add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(b)(1) Upon receipt by the Office of Driver Services of evaluations
required under subsection (a) of this section, the Office of Driver Services
may suspend or revoke the license of the person or may permit the person to
retain his or her license or may issue a license subject to restrictions as
permitted under § 27-16-804.
(2) If the Office of Driver Services requires a licensee to
submit to an evaluation under subsection (a) of this section because the
person suffered a seizure, the Office of Driver Services shall not suspend or
revoke the license of the person or impose a restriction on the driver's
license of the person for a period greater than six (6) months from the date
that he or she last experienced a seizure regardless of whether the person is
on medication.

/s/M. Johnson












03-31-2025 09:47:32 ZRC102